Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1201.14
Existing Business Assistance Division; duties.

The primary responsibility of the Existing Business Assistance Division shall be to provide assistance to instate businesses. Such assistance shall encourage the startup of new businesses and the retention and expansion of existing businesses. Emphasis shall be placed upon meeting the unique needs of small businesses in the state. Activities of the division shall include, but not be limited to, financial packaging, technical assistance, contacts with existing businesses regarding needs, work force development, job training assistance, export technical assistance, and assistance to businesses in accessing new markets and new technologies.

The division shall avoid duplication with existing programs already in place which assist small businesses and entrepreneurs, and the department and the division shall deliver their programs through, to the extent possible, the Nebraska Business Development Center, the University of Nebraska-Lincoln Food Processing Center, the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority, the Small Business Administration of the federal government, and other related organizations.

Laws 1986, LB 965, § 14;

Laws 1987, LB 736, § 7;

Laws 1989, LB 639, § 4;

Laws 1997, LB 659, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB388, § 3.

Business Development Partnership Act, see section 81-1272.

Nebraska Investment Finance Authority Act, see section 58-201.